Utah statutes.
35A-8-410.   Penalties for fraudulently obtaining or continuing to receive housing assistance benefits.

(1)  A person may not knowingly, by misrepresentation, impersonation, or other fraudulent means, make a false statement to housing authority personnel or, after being accepted as a recipient of housing authority benefits, fail to disclose to housing authority personnel any:

(a)  change in household composition;

(b)  employment change;

(c)  change in marital status;

(d)  receipt of any other monetary assistance;

(e)  receipt of in-kind gifts; or

(f)  other material fact or change in circumstances that would affect the determination of that person's eligibility to receive housing assistance benefits, or would affect the amount of benefits for which the person is eligible.

(2)  A person may not fail to disclose any of the information described in Subsection (1) for the purpose of obtaining or continuing to receive funds or other housing assistance benefits to which the person is not entitled, or in an amount larger than that to which the person is entitled.

(3)  A person who has duties relating to the administration of a housing authority program may not fraudulently misappropriate funds or other assistance with which the person has been entrusted, or of which the person has gained possession by virtue of the person's position.

(4)  A person may not knowingly:

(a)  file or falsify a claim, report, or document required by state or federal law, or provider agreement, to obtain or attempt to obtain unauthorized housing assistance benefits under this part; or

(b)  attempt to commit, or aid or abet the commission of, an act prohibited by this section.

(5)  The punishment for violation of a provision of this section by a housing assistance recipient is determined by the cumulative value of the money or other benefits the person received from all instances of fraud committed by the person, and not by each separate instance of fraud.

(6)  The punishment for the offenses of this section are:

(a)  a second degree felony if the value of the funds or other benefits received, misappropriated, claimed, or applied for, is equal to or exceeds $5,000;

(b)  a third degree felony if the value of the funds or other benefits received, misappropriated, claimed, or applied for, is equal to or greater than $1,500 but less than $5,000;

(c)  a class A misdemeanor if the value of the funds or other benefits received, misappropriated, claimed, or applied for, is equal to or greater than $500 but less than $1,500; or

(d)  a class B misdemeanor if the value of the funds or other benefits received, misappropriated, claimed, or applied for, is less than $500.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

